Maryland, session 2026, HB1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1311*

HOUSE BILL 1311
Article – Correctional Services
Subtitle 7. Federal [Pell Grants] AND STATE STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
Access and Postsecondary Education Program Tracking Systems.
2–701.
(a) The Department shall assist incarcerated individuals in accessing federal Pell
Grants AND STATE STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE for higher education.
(b) In order to assist incarcerated individuals in accessing federal Pell Grants
AND STATE STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE, the Department shall consult with THE
MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION AND institutions of higher education,
including:
(1) all University System of Maryland institutions;
(2) Morgan State University;
(3) Anne Arundel Community College;
(4) Hagerstown Community College;
(5) Wor–Wic Community College; and
(6) Goucher College.
Article – Education
18–116.
STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS TITLE SHALL BE
AVAILABLE TO INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO MEET THE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA
FOR THE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.